Hawaii statutes.
[§302D-3.2] Fees. (a) In
administering its responsibilities, the commission may assess fees on non-state
entities and individuals to help offset its operating costs.

(b) Fees collected by the commission shall be
deposited into insured checking or savings accounts and shall be expended by
the commission.

(c) The commission shall adopt rules pursuant
to chapter 91 to implement this section; provided that, notwithstanding this
section or any other law to the contrary, the commission may set the initial
amount of fees authorized pursuant to this section at any time without regard
to chapter 91, if the commission:

(1) Holds at least one public hearing to take and
discuss public testimony on the proposed fee amount; and

(2) Provides public notice at least thirty days prior
to the date of the public hearing. [L 2014, c 99, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next